Hawaii statutes.
§604-13 [Arrest under warrant.]
Whenever any warrant of arrest has been issued by any court of competent
jurisdiction, and the accused is beyond the jurisdiction of the court, it shall
be lawful for the officer to whom the warrant is directed, to pursue and arrest
the accused in any part of the State. [L 1868, p 21; am L 1923, c 67, §1; RL
1925, §2280; RL 1935, §3770; RL 1945, §9680; RL 1955, §216-11; HRS §604-13; am
L 1970, c 188, §21; am L 1973, c 167, §1]

Rules of Court

See HRPP rule 9(c).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next